Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,291
Mobile home parks; fire safety inspection; fee.

A local government may request the State Fire Marshal to inspect for fire safety any mobile home park which the local government exercises jurisdiction over, pursuant to section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal shall assess a fee for such inspection pursuant to section 81-505.01 and payable by the licensee or applicant for a license. The authority to make such investigations may be delegated to qualified local fire prevention personnel pursuant to section 81-502.

Laws 1983, LB 498, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 680;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 588;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4635;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 31;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 37.
July 18, 2026